North Carolina, session 2025, SB126.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 3 of Chapter 143C of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 143C-3-3.1. Zero-based budgeting estimates.
(a) Commencing with the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, in each even-numbered year
each State agency of the executive branch designated in a scheduled year, as described in
subsection (e) of this section, shall prepare and submit to the Office of State Budget and
Management (OSBM) a zero-based budget plan for the fiscal biennium beginning July 1 of the
following fiscal year. OSBM shall provide technical assistance to support each State agency in
completing its zero-based budget plan. For purposes of this section, the term "zero-based budget"
means a budget that reflects the amount of funding deemed necessary to achieve the most
cost-effective performance of a State agency pursuant to an accompanying narrative delineating
the tasks to be performed by the State agency together with the goals and objectives for the State
agency for a period not to exceed two years. The budget shall have a zero dollar amount as its
basis and shall not reflect any prior appropriation amount, adjusted or otherwise.
(b) At a minimum, a State agency's plan shall contain the following information:
(1) A description of those discrete activities that comprise the agency, and a
justification for the existence of each activity by reference to statute or other
legal authority.
(2) For each activity, a quantitative estimate of any adverse impacts that could
reasonably be expected should the activity be discontinued, together with a
full description of the methods by which the adverse impact is estimated.
(3) A list of quantifiable program outcomes that measure the efficiency and
effectiveness of each program.
(4) For each activity, an itemized account of expenditures that would be required
to maintain the activity at the minimum level of service required by the
statutory authority, together with a concise statement of the quantity and
quality of services required at that minimum level.
(5) For each activity, an itemized account of expenditures required to maintain
the activity at current levels of service, together with a concise statement of
the quantity and quality of services being provided.
(6) A ranking of all activities that shows the relative contribution of each activity
to the overall goals and purposes of the agency at current service levels.
*S126-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) OSBM shall submit the zero-based budget plans for those State agencies required to
prepare plans pursuant to the schedule set forth in subsection (e) of this section no later than
when the Governor presents budget recommendations to the General Assembly under
G.S. 143C-3-5.
(d) All statutory appropriations, as defined in G.S. 143C-1-1(d), shall be excluded from
any zero-based budgeting plans.
(e) State agencies shall submit zero-based budget plans pursuant to the following
schedule:
(1) In 2025, and every eight years thereafter, for the following Divisions within
the Department of Health and Human Services:
a. Aging and Adult Services.
b. Child and Family Well-Being.
c. Employment and Independence for People with Disabilities.
d. Health Benefits.
e. Health Service Regulation.
f. Services for the Blind.
g. Services for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing.
(2) In 2027, and every eight years thereafter, for the following agencies:
a. Divisions within the Department of Health and Human Services as
follows:
1. Central Management and Support.
2. Child Development and Early Education.
3. Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use
Services.
4. Public Health.
5. Social Services.
b. Department of Public Instruction.
(3) In 2029, and every eight years thereafter, for the following agencies:
a. Office of Administrative Hearings.
b. Department of Adult Correction.
c. Department of Commerce.
d. Office of the State Controller.
e. State Board of Elections.
f. Office of State Human Resources.
g. Department of Information Technology.
h. Department of Justice.
i. Department of Natural and Cultural Resources.
j. Department of Revenue.
k. Department of the Secretary of State.
l. Department of State Treasurer.
m. Wildlife Resources Commission.
(4) In 2031, and every eight years thereafter, for the following agencies:
a. Department of Administration.
b. Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.
c. Office of State Auditor.
d. Office of State Budget and Management.
e. Department of Environmental Quality.
f. Housing Finance Agency.
g. Indigent Defense Services.
h. Industrial Commission.
i. Department of Insurance.
Page 2 Senate Bill 126-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
j. Department of Labor.
k. Department of Military and Veterans Affairs.
l. Department of Public Safety."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Senate Bill 126-First Edition Page 3